verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
am V ;
bail V ;
habl V ;
nad V ;
lav V ;
llam V ;
tir V ;
tom V ;
trabaj V ;
viaj V ;

!Lexicon with Verb POS tag only:
LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

!Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and tags:
LEXICON V-suff
+Pres+1+Sg:o     # ;
+Pres+1+Pl:amos  # ;
+Pres+2+Sg:as    # ;
+Pres+2+Pl:an    # ;
+Pres+3+Sg:a     # ;
+Pres+3+Pl:an    # ;
+Inf:ar          # ;
